Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
201B

HAWAII TOURISM AUTHORITY

Part I. General Provisions

Section

201B-1 Definitions

201B-2 Hawaii tourism authority; establishment;
board;

president and chief executive officer

201B-2.5 Authority, private attorneys

201B-3 Powers, generally

201B-4 Meetings of the board

201B-5 Exemption of Hawaii tourism authority from

administrative supervision of boards and
commissions

201B-6 Tourism marketing plan; measures of
effectiveness

201B-7 Tourism-related activities

201B-7.5 Applicability of Hawaii public procurement
code;

convention center contractor; construction
contracts

201B-8 Convention center enterprise special fund

201B-8.5, 8.6 Repealed

201B-9 Tourism emergency

201B-10 Tourism emergency special fund

Part II. Tourism Special Fund;
Exemptions; Reports

201B-11 Tourism special fund

201B-12 Exemption of authority from taxation and Hawaii public

procurement code

201B-13 Assistance by state and county agencies;
advisory

group

201B-14 Declaration of public function, purpose,
and necessity

201B-15 Court proceedings; preferences; venue

201B-16 Annual report

Note

Hawaiian cultural programs; reports to 2016 to 2018
legislature. L 2015, c 119, §135.

Two-year pilot project; working group to identify and
implement management strategies to resolve user conflicts on public
recreational lands; reports to 2015-2016 legislature (ceases to exist on June
30, 2016). L 2014, c 145.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next